incubator/apertium-fo-is.fo.dix
    <pardef n="mentanararbeið/i__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ð</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ð</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>num</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unum</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sett__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="skeinkingarloyvi"><i>skeinkingarloyv</i><par n="mentanararbeið/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sett"><i>sett</i><par n="sett__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mentanararbeiði"><i>mentanararbeið</i><par n="mentanararbeið/i__n"/></e>
